Utah statutes.
39-6-41.   Contempt -- Penalty.
(1)  A military court may punish for contempt any person who uses any menacing
word, sign, or gesture in its presence, or who disturbs its proceedings by any
disorderly conduct.
(2)  The punishment may not exceed confinement for three days in the county
jail of the county where the proceedings are held, or a fine of $200, or both.
